Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0766.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 16201. (1) A licensee or registrant shall renew the license or registration on or before the expiration date as prescribed by rule. The department shall mail a notice to the licensee or registrant at the last known address on file with a board, or may send the notice by electronic mail to a licensee or registrant described in section 16192(4), advising of the time, procedure, and fee for renewal. Failure of the licensee or registrant to receive notice under this subsection does not relieve the licensee or registrant of the responsibility for renewing his or her the license or registration. (2) A license or registration not renewed by the expiration date may be renewed within 60 days after the expiration date on application, payment of renewal and late renewal fees, and fulfillment of any continued competency or continuing education requirements set forth in this article or rules promulgated under this article. The licensee or registrant may continue to practice and use the title during the 60-day time period. (3) If a license or registration is not renewed within 60 days after the expiration date under subsection (2), the license or registration is considered null and void. The licensee shall not practice or use the title and a registrant shall not use the title. Except as otherwise provided in this article or by rule and subject to subsection (6), an individual may be relicensed or reregistered within 3 years after the expiration date on application, payment of the application processing, renewal, and late renewal fees, and fulfillment of any continued competency or continuing education requirements in effect on the expiration date, or that would have been required had the individual renewed his or her the license or registration under subsection (1). A temporary license or registration may be issued under section 16181 pending the results of action taken under this subsection. (4) Except as otherwise provided in this article or by rule, an individual may be relicensed or reregistered more than 3 years after the expiration date on application as a new applicant, meeting all licensure or registration requirements in effect at the time of application, taking or retaking and passing any examinations required for initial licensure or registration, and payment of fees required of new applicants. (5) The expiration or surrender of a license or registration does not terminate the board's authority to impose sanctions on the licensee or registrant whose license or registration has expired or been surrendered. (6) Subsection (3) applies to an individual who is granted a temporary or limited license to fulfill requirements to obtain full licensure under this article, if the individual's temporary or limited license was subject to remaining renewal cycles before it expired.